Maryland, session 2026, HB0580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
8–101.
(a) Under the supervision of the State Board, and in accordance with regulations
and procedures adopted by the State Board, a local board shall conduct all elections held
under this article in the county in which the board is located.
(b) Except where it would be inappropriate, or as otherwise provided in this
article, the electoral process for primary elections, general elections, and special elections
shall be uniform.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0580*

HOUSE BILL 580
(C) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “APPROVAL VOTING” MEANS A METHOD OF CASTING AND
TABULATING VOTES IN WHICH VOTERS MAY CHOOSE ANY NUMBER OF CANDIDATES
AND THE CANDIDATE CHOSEN MOST OFTEN IS ELECTED.
(III) “RANKED–CHOICE VOTING” MEANS A METHOD OF CASTING
AND TABULATING VOTES IN WHICH VOTERS RANK CANDIDATES IN ORDER OF
PREFERENCE AND VOTES ARE TABULATED IN A MANNER THAT REFLECTS VOTER
PREFERENCE.
(2) THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY COUNCIL MAY, BY LAW, ADOPT A
RANKED–CHOICE VOTING SYSTEM OR AN APPROVAL VOTING SYSTEM FOR
ELECTIONS FOR ANY ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING OFFICES:
(I) COUNTY EXECUTIVE;
(II) MEMBER OF THE COUNTY COUNCIL;
(III) JUDGE OF THE CIRCUIT COURT;
(IV) STATE’S ATTORNEY;
(V) REGISTER OF WILLS;
(VI) SHERIFF; AND
(VII) MEMBER OF THE BOARD OF EDUCATION.
(3) A LOCAL LAW ENACTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY PROVIDE
FOR:
(I) THE BALLOT FORMAT;
(II) PROCEDURES FOR TABULATING VOTES; AND
(III) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT
RANKED–CHOICE VOTING OR APPROVAL VOTING.
(4) A LOCAL LAW ENACTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
PROVIDE FOR AN EDUCATIONAL CAMPAIGN EXPLAINING HOW TO VOTE USING
RANKED–CHOICE VOTING OR APPROVAL VOTING.

HOUSE BILL 580 3
9–204.
(a) Subject to the other provisions of this subtitle and to different presentations
required or made desirable by different voting systems, all ballots used in an election shall
be as uniform as possible.
(b) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this title, or unless a provision is
clearly inappropriate to absentee ballots, the provisions of this subtitle relating to ballot
content and arrangement shall apply to the arrangement of absentee ballots.
(c) If applicable for the voting system in use, the appropriate components of the
voting system shall be configured for a primary election to permit the voter to vote only for
the candidates for which the voter is entitled to vote.
(D) THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY COUNCIL MAY, BY A LAW ADOPTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–101(C) OF THIS ARTICLE, PROVIDE FOR THE FORMAT OF
BALLOTS TO BE USED IN AN ELECTION CONDUCTED BY RANKED–CHOICE VOTING OR
APPROVAL VOTING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.